Massachusetts, session 194th, H1540.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The first paragraph of section 30 of chapter 23B of the General Laws, as amended by
section 120 of chapter 7 of the acts of 2023, is hereby further amended by adding the following
sentence:- Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the
emergency housing assistance program established herein shall be available only to residents of
the commonwealth who are citizens of the United States.
of 1